Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1607
Permit; application; fee; costs; priority for processing.

(1) A person applying for a permit shall:

(a) Comply with application requirements set by the commission;

(b) Pay a fee in an amount set by the commission. The amount of the fee shall be set by rule and regulation and shall be based on the commission's anticipated cost of processing the application. The fee shall be deposited in the Carbon Dioxide Storage Facility Administrative Fund; and

(c) Pay to the commission the costs the commission incurs in publishing notices for hearings and holding hearings on permit applications.

(2) In processing permit applications, the commission shall give priority to storage operators who intend to store carbon dioxide produced in Nebraska.

Laws 2021, LB650, § 7.